Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.170

Self-authentication.

(1) In any pretrial or posttrial proceeding, an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation is self-authenticating if it is accompanied by a certificate of authenticity sworn under oath or affirmation by an appropriate law enforcement officer.

(2) This chapter does not limit the right of an individual to challenge the authenticity of an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation under law of this state other than this chapter.

[ 2021 c 329 s 17.]